Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.200

Director or individuals acting on director's behalf—Immunity.

The director or individuals acting on the director's behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on acts performed in the course of their duties in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 86 s 281; 1994 c 237 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.